District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.06

Financial score.

The Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall calculate a financial score for each eligible financial institution. For each bid solicitation, the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall decide how much weight and how many points to give each of the following elements to calculate the financial score:

(1)

Investment and deposit bids based on the rate of return that a bidder offers;

(2)

Financial services bids based on the cost of service;

(3)

All bids based on an assessment of risk and financial condition;

(4)

All bids based on the capacity of a bidder to perform and prior performance record; and

(5)

Any other criteria required to evaluate a bid.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
This section is referenced in § 47-351.05 and § 47-351.07.
1981 Ed., § 47-351.6.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.